tests/wad.twoc
Alphabet

! A B D E G I J K L M N O P R S T U V W Y Z Ŋ
! a b d e g i j k l m n o p r s t u v w y z ŋ
! %{A%}:a %{A%}:0 ! %>:0

  %[%+1incdu%]:0 %[%+1incpl%]:0 %[%+1sg%]:0 %[%+1excdu%]:0 %[%+1excpl%]:0 %[%+2sg%]:0 %[%+2du%]:0 %[%+2pl%]:0 %[%+3sg%]:0 %[%+3du%]:0 %[%+3plhum%]:0 %[%+3plnh%]:0  %[%-1incdu%]:0 %[%-1incpl%]:0 %[%-1sg%]:0 %[%-1excdu%]:0 %[%-1excpl%]:0 %[%-2sg%]:0 %[%-2du%]:0 %[%-2pl%]:0 %[%-3sg%]:0 %[%-3du%]:0 %[%-3plhum%]:0 %[%-3plnh%]:0

 %[%+appl%]:0 %[%-appl%]:0
 %[%+caus%]:0 %[%-caus%]:0

%<v%>

! Number morphology
%<pl%>
%<sg%>
%<du%>

!%<p1%>
!%<p2%>
!%<p3%>

!%<incl%>
!%<excl%>

!%<caus%>
!%<appl%>
;

Sets

Prefix = %[%+1incdu%] %[%+1incpl%] %[%+1sg%] %[%+1excdu%] %[%+1excpl%] %[%+2sg%] %[%+2du%] %[%+2pl%] %[%+3sg%] %[%+3du%] %[%+3plhum%] %[%+3plnh%] %[%+appl%] %[%+caus%] ;

Suffix = %[%-1incdu%] %[%-1incpl%] %[%-1sg%] %[%-1excdu%] %[%-1excpl%] %[%-2sg%] %[%-2du%] %[%-2pl%] %[%-3sg%] %[%-3du%] %[%-3plhum%] %[%-3plnh%] %[%-appl%] %[%-caus%] ;

Rules

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in Prefix
         Fy in Suffix
   matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
Fy:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fx:0 :* _ ;
   where Fx in Prefix
         Fy in Suffix
   matched ;
